Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1220
Permit, defined.

Permit means a written authorization required by an authority to perform an action, initiate, continue, or complete installation of a small wireless facility on an existing utility pole or attached to an existing wireless support structure, or to install, modify, or replace a utility pole to support installation of a small wireless facility.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 20.